Idaho, session 2026, H0599.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-4804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-4804. PUBLIC SCHOOL DIGITAL CONTENT AND CURRICULUM FUND. (1) There
is hereby established in the state treasury the public school digital con-
tent and curriculum fund, to be administered by the state department of edu-
cation, which shall make available moneys in the fund, subject to appropri-
ation, for schools to provide Idaho classrooms, including classrooms at the
Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf and the blind, with digi-
tal content and curriculum that directly impact student achievement and im-
prove performance. Curriculum programs shall be designed to enhance out-
comes for students in career technical education, character education, en-
richment activities, reading and mathematics, and activities that increase
grade-to-grade promotion and enhance career and college readiness. Moneys
from the fund may also be spent on academic text support systems that in-
clude authentic fiction and nonfiction books, provide reader supports, pro-
vide teaching tools, and promote parent engagement. Moneys in the fund shall
consist of legislative appropriations and are continuously appropriated for
the purposes identified in this section. Any interest earned on idle moneys
in the fund shall be returned to the fund.
(2) Subject to availability, moneys in the fund shall be distributed
at the request of a local education agency (LEA) and shall be based on the
amount requested. A single request must shall not exceed fifty thousand dol-
lars ($50,000). Distributions from the fund shall be made on a first-come,
first-served basis to LEAS that meet the criteria outlined in this subsec-
tion. If an LEA meets such criteria but a distribution cannot be made due
to lack of available moneys, such LEA's request shall be prioritized, in the
order received, once moneys become available to LEAs that meet the require-
ments as outlined in this subsection based on competitive, needs-based cri-
teria established by the state department of education. If distributions
cannot be made due to lack of available moneys, requests by eligible LEAs
shall be prioritized according to the competitive, needs-based criteria es-
tablished by the state department of education pursuant to this subsection
once moneys become available. Two (2) or more LEAs may jointly request a dis-
tribution. To qualify for funding, an LEA must shall:
(a) Have technology infrastructure in place to facilitate usage of the
digital content and curriculum; and


(b) Submit an explanation for how the distribution will be used to
improve performance and enhance student achievement. Explanations
should include:
(i) The amount of moneys requested;
(ii) The type of content or curriculum to be purchased;
(iii) How the purchase will assist the LEA in meeting its identi-
fied measurable targets from its continuous improvement plan as
described in section 33-320, Idaho Code; and
(iv) How progress toward those targets will be measured.
(3) Additional distributions shall be granted to an LEA only if, after
the initial distribution, the LEA has met or is making demonstrable progress
toward its measurable targets.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.